Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
General Provisions

§ 21-1-1.
Classification of municipalities.

The municipal corporations existing in this state are divided into three classes, to wit: cities, towns and villages. Those having two thousand inhabitants or more shall be classed as cities; those having less than two thousand and not less than three hundred inhabitants shall be classed as towns; and those having less than three hundred and not less than one hundred inhabitants shall be classed as villages. No municipal corporation shall be created hereafter except those classed as cities or towns. However, a municipality may be created in an area embracing not less than one square mile wherein there is then in existence or under construction not less than one mile of improved hard surface streets, with a total of not less than six streets making up said one mile of hard surface streets and there then exists or is under construction a public utilities system which shall include a waterworks system or sewerage system, or both. Nothing herein shall affect the status of any municipal corporation heretofore created and now existing, and all such municipal corporations, including villages, shall continue to exist as such with all the rights and privileges thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2911; 1906, § 3299; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5795; 1930, § 2369; 1942 § 3374-01; Laws, 1900, ch. 70; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 1; Laws, 1964, ch. 494, eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).

§ 21-1-3.
Change of classification according to federal census.

Whenever a census taken under an act of Congress shall show that the population of a city, town or village has increased or diminished so as to take or place such city, town or village out of the class to which it theretofore has belonged, the governing authorities of the municipality shall enter an order on the minutes thereof reciting such fact and adjudging the proper class of such municipality according to such census, and shall forward a certified copy of such order to the secretary of state, who shall file same with the other records pertaining to such municipality and keep same as a permanent record. Thereafter, such municipality shall be classed according to the population shown by such census, and such census shall be conclusive on the question of such classification.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2917; 1906, § 3308; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5804; 1930, § 2379; 1942, § 3374-26; Laws, 1896, ch. 166; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-1-5.
Corporate names.

The corporate name of a city shall be “The City of_______________ .” The corporate name of a town shall be “The town of_______________ .” The corporate name of a village shall be “The village of_______________ .” In each case the blank shall be filled in with the name by which such municipality has been legally designated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2912; 1906, § 3300; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5796; 1930, § 2370; 1942, § 3374-02; Laws, 1938, ch. 335; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 2.

§ 21-1-7.
Changing corporate name.

The mayor and board of aldermen or municipal authorities may change the name of any municipality by preparing in writing the proposed change and having same published for three weeks in a newspaper published in such municipality, if there be one, and, if none, then by posting for said time in at least three public places therein, after which the proposed change shall be submitted to the governor for his approval. If, after publication is made, one-tenth of the qualified electors of the municipality shall within ten days after the completion of such publication protest against the proposed change, the governor shall not approve same until it shall be submitted to and ratified by a majority of the qualified electors of the municipality. When approved by the governor, the same shall be recorded in the office of the secretary of state and upon the record of the municipal governing authorities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3445; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6005; 1930, § 2615; 1942, § 3374-30; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-1-9.
Designation of municipalities.

All municipalities operating under Chapter 99, Mississippi Code of 1906, and all municipalities operating under Title 21, Chapter 3, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be designated as having “Code Charters.” All municipalities operating under Title 21, Chapter 5, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be designated as having “Commission Form of Government.” All municipalities operating under Title 21, Chapter 7, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be designated as having “Council Form of Government.” All municipalities operating under Title 21, Chapter 9, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be designated as having “Council-Manager Form of Government.” All other municipalities shall be designated as having “Private Charters,” or such other form of government as may be created by the legislature, such cities to be designated by the act creating such special form of government.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, ch. 99; 1942, § 3374-31; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-1-11.
Judicial notice to be taken of class and powers of municipality.

The courts shall take judicial notice of the class to which each of the municipalities of the state belongs, and of its powers under the provisions of this title.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3038; 1906, § 3443; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6003; 1930, § 2614; 1942, § 3374-29; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1950.